Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SCHOOL-LINKED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for school-linked behavioral health grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4901. Of these amounts, $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 must be used for grants to increase access to mental health and substance use disorder treatment and services for families of children receiving services through school-linked behavioral health providers. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end